lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.dic
අකුල/406,2422,3411
අනික/5,7,20,32,180,193,1424,2665,4035
අස්වැසිලි/539,2186
ආශ්‍රය/1,3,7,77,86,843,4966,4967
ඇඟවූ/15,210
ඇදහිය/1062,1208
ඇසුර/1,3,4,7,18,24,32,77,112,127,211,216,287,834,1321,1515,3501
ඉතිරි/2,10,13,52,86,87,156,177,480,564,571,3006
ඉවසා/90,289,3110,4777
උඩුකය/3,4815
උතුර/1,3,6,7,18,20,24,33,35,103,118,240,3549
ඔත්පල/2,1782
කඩවල/1,18,2289,3418
කරති/11,1305,2178
කවුන්සල/2,13,15,19,3114
කසාද/13,27,493,2602,2675,3582
කාර්යක්ෂම/10,4382
කිරි/6,8,11,26,29,30,50,65,71,78,112,172,190,235,345,409,484,600,1233,1514,2068,2074,2253,2619,2842,3030,3031,3051,3447,3746,3824,4115,4580,4786,4803,4970
කුහර/3,13,15,19,725,1631,4798
කෙරුණ/3,4,16,20,23,24,275,1225,1680,3899
කෙරෙන/5,10,24,35,44,67,68,108,159,175,215,328,351,418,852,1478,1944,2450
කොල්ල/1,2,9,13,15,19,20,38,41,53,79,166,174,225,348,364,415,458,473,507,583,697,899,994,995,1121,1554,2476,2816,4112,4113,4852,4853
කොහා/1,1161
ගවයා/1,6,14,40,96,107,111,405,441,653,1547
ගාණට/11,575
ගැමි/27,47,62,74,81,97,100,136,195,200,239,501,509,1222,1329,1475,2581,4927
තමනට/546
තිබුණ/1,3,5,6,7,12,16,20,24,49,83,98,115,129,184,192,275,590,649,973,1785,2668,2692,3879,3899
තේරී/8,50,65,71,75,78,135,162,219,332,464,542,655,767,836,919,1144,1331,1409,3064,4830
තොටුපළ/1,3,7,17,18,22,26,34,254,1495,2227,2964,2966,4595,4597
ත්‍රිකෝණය/1,17,2398
දඬුවම/1,4,5,18,22,99,110,1797,3601
දසවන/776,3415
දිමුතු/1,4525
දිවිගෙවන/55,4753
දෙවන/6,16,24,68,207,292,776,1353,1556,1800,2019,3234,3681
දෙවි/1,27,47,62,74,81,97,132,141,146,200,232,381,593,1236,1652,2090,3724,3851,3852,4606
දේවතාවා/1538
නිවස/1,3,4,5,8,10,17,18,22,28,32,34,58,100,153,228,566,2411,2910,2911,3363
නෙළා/125,347,1149,2255
නොදැන/3,211,230,287,310,316,2241,3468,3759,4790
නොපා/11,934,3005,4876
නොපෙනී/8,162,4245,4275
නොමද/10,3231,3898
නොයන/24,58,67,284,786,1978
පන්සීයක/1,5,2025
පරදී/3047
පළකර/11,82,103,144,165,515,844,1337,3116
පැටවු/9,41,72,89,91,395,544,914,1804,1805
පැවසී/2,8,50,51,75,135,162,194,542,831,832,1516,1854,2263,3003
පිපී/63,125,135,162,767,4694
පිම්බා/4,289,1496,2242
පිළිකා/1319,4807,4808
පිළිගන්න/1978,2515,3554
පුවත/1,3,4,5,7,17,18,23,32,99,229,350,2565,3630,3870
පෙන්වන/429,875,1007
පෙරළී/567,650,919
බලකා/2,13,15,19,27,62,101,3118,4621
බලපෑම/1,3,4,5,7,11,22,28,77,108,110,152,1088,1189,3504
මනෝහර/5,9,4960
මඳකම/1856,4875
මිදී/8,50,65,75,90,135,162,235,440,464,567,650,761,1219,1322,1818,2026,3050,4805
මිනි/2,43,93,1213,1367,1514,1660,4580
මීමා/1,312,653,1319,4880
මුතු/9,30,183,292,321,1444,1473,1483,3765,4306,4483,4497,4752
මුදල/1,3,4,5,6,7,9,16,17,18,22,23,28,77,99,108,110,116,152,229,633,693,777,863,866,1889,2332,2404,2489,2808,2890,3162,3166,3257
මුදු/106,306,331,1296,1482,4028,4306
මෙපරිදි/2917
මෙවැනි/2,8,1767,4409,4438,4439
මොලය/1,3,953
රක්ත/1243,1666,2493
රිංගා/63,90,547,2255
ලිවී/2,8,50,65,75,78,345,832,4245
වතාවට/2,6,178,803
වයනු/2199
වලසා/107,201,413,837,1829
වස්තු/9,10,26,29,36,37,41,45,54,94,120,378,1191,1473,3802,4755
වැරැදි/2,11,19,29,236,466,920,4472,4939,4952
වැළකි/2,8,708,920
වැළකී/491,767,1144,2855,4688
විඥාන/13,15,139,170,2645
විදි/2,9,13,15,19,33,43,48,60,78,82,98,123,144,240,257,502,577,600,604,708,740,741,855,920,1329,1833,1918,2267,2405,2884,3051,3903,4333,4334,4336,4452,4819,4939,4948
විද්‍යාල/1604,3548,3569
වියයුතු/2,2933
වෙළෙඳපළ/26,2230,4607
වෛද්‍යවරයා/1,14,96,107,173,404
සංයෝග/2,4,13,15,19,21,26,29,38,48,139,226,1434,2771
සදහට/8,3741,3856
සමුදා/2,13,19,27,43,46,2268,3055,4317,4319,4321,4695
සම්බල/13,4874
සලසා/63,90,329,484,977,4246,4273
සායන/2,13,27,29,43,46,68,128,964
සැමරූ/98,386
සැලසී/119,491,1144,1517
සැලැස්ම/3,4,7,9,22,32,3465,3471
සෑදී/135,162,491,541,542,831,1516,3003
සිඟා/1164
සිද්ධි/2,13,15,19,21,26,29,30,43,46,53,60,66,185,313,469,1153,1524,2039,4958
සුදුසු/2,8,161,177,309,1462,1463,1919,2167,4187,4193,4194
සූපවේදය/3126
සෙසු/617,4177
ස්ත්‍රි/2,9,13,19,38,41,73,170,313,320,665,797,1153,1332,1400,1523,1831,4961
හටගත/5,16,311,461,607,971,1240,1878
හයිට/5,1683,1715
හැගී/71,332,542,2601
හැදු/33,35,36,45,82,95,142,256,471,717,1013,1191,2994,2998
හැපී/8,50,135,567,650,831,1812
හෑරී/50,65,71,119,135,2263,3032
හිනැහී/464,491
